Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Part 2 Tennessee Meat and Poultry Inspection Act
53-7-214. Relation of part to other laws.

This part shall not apply to any act or transaction subject to regulation under the federal Meat Inspection Act, compiled in 21 U.S.C. § 601 et seq., or the federal Poultry Products Inspection Act, compiled in 21 U.S.C. § 451 et seq.; provided, that inspectors are not excluded from making routine inspections and from taking samples at federally inspected plants for determining compliance with related federal acts and for compliance with state acts; and provided, further, that graduated license fees shall be required of those plants slaughtering livestock and poultry and processing meat food products and poultry products.

The commissioner may cooperate with the federal government in carrying out this part or the federal Meat Inspection Act or the federal Poultry Products Inspection Act.

Compliance with this part does not relieve any person from compliance with the Tennessee Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, compiled in chapter 1 of this title, and associated regulations and with the Testing and Sealing — Use of Weights and Measures Act, compiled in title 47, chapter 26, part 9, and associated regulations.

Acts 1967, ch. 99, § 14; T.C.A., § 52-928.

Cross-References. “Federal Meat Inspection Act” defined, § 53-7-202.

“Federal Poultry Products Inspection Act” defined, § 53-7-202.

Retail food store inspections, title 53, ch. 8, part 2.

53-7-215. Cost of inspections borne by department of agriculture — Exception.

The cost of inspections made to effectuate this part shall be borne by the department of agriculture; provided, that any extra cost of inspection resulting from overtime operation shall be borne by the establishment operating overtime pursuant to reasonable rules and regulations with respect to inspections that may be promulgated by the commissioner.

Acts 1967, ch. 99, § 15; T.C.A., § 52-929.

53-7-216. License required for the operation of an establishment — Application.

No person shall maintain an establishment for the slaughtering of livestock or poultry or the processing of livestock, deer, or poultry without first having secured a license from the department of agriculture and having paid all inspection and license fees.

Each separate business location shall be licensed, and the license shall not be transferable.

Any person desiring a license shall make written application to the commissioner, stating the information required by the commissioner.

Upon receipt of the application, the department shall make an examination and inspection of the establishment, and if it is found to be in a sanitary condition and to conform to the requirements of this part and of the regulations promulgated pursuant to this part, the commissioner, upon receipt of the license and inspection fees provided in § 53-7-219, shall issue a license authorizing the applicant to carry on the establishment for the slaughtering of livestock or poultry or the processing of livestock, deer, or poultry.

The license shall be valid for the remainder of the calendar year for which it is issued.

Acts 1967, ch. 99, § 16; T.C.A., § 52-930; Acts 2007, ch. 421, §§ 17, 18.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 421, § 20 provided that the commissioner of agriculture is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

53-7-217. Revocation or suspension of license — General provisions for hearings and appeals.

If any establishment licensed under this part is deemed by the commissioner to be operated or maintained in any unsanitary manner, or in violation of any of this part or of any regulation duly promulgated pursuant to this part, the commissioner may give written notice of at least ten (10) days to the person operating the establishment to appear before the commissioner or the commissioner's designated hearing officer at a time and place to be set out in the written notice, to show cause why the license of the establishment should not be suspended or revoked. Upon the hearing, the person or establishment cited may be heard in person or with counsel, or both, may present evidence, and may cross-examine witnesses. A full and complete record of the hearing shall be recorded and any party to the proceedings, upon request, shall be supplied with a transcript of the proceedings at the usual cost.

The commissioner is authorized, in the commissioner's discretion, to appoint and designate a hearing officer who shall preside at the hearing in the place of and in the absence of the commissioner. The hearing officer shall have the power and authority to conduct the hearing, to administer oaths, and make findings of fact, conclusions of law, and the proposed order based on the findings of fact and conclusions of law. If the commissioner concurs, the commissioner shall issue the order; or the commissioner may, upon review of the record, make findings, conclusions and issue orders that, in the commissioner's discretion, the record justifies.

Any person whose license has been suspended or revoked by the commissioner pursuant to a hearing under this section shall be assessed and shall pay all costs in connection with the hearing. The commissioner shall take all steps necessary to collect the costs as may be authorized under the statutes of the state in the same manner as now authorized for the collection of taxes by the state.

No later than sixty (60) days following the hearing, the commissioner shall issue any order that may be appropriate under the circumstances, and the commissioner may, if the facts adduced at the hearing warrant, suspend for any period or revoke any license issued under this part.

The action of the commissioner and the order issued by the commissioner may be reviewed by petition for common law writ of certiorari, addressed to the circuit court of Davidson County, which petition shall be filed within ten (10) days from the date the order of the commissioner is made.

Immediately upon the grant of the writ of certiorari, the commissioner shall cause to be made, certified and forwarded to the court a complete transcript of the proceedings in the cause, which shall contain all the proof submitted before the commissioner. All defendants named in the petition desiring to make defense shall answer or otherwise plead to the petition within ten (10) days from the date of the filing of the transcript, unless the time is extended by the court.

The decision of the commissioner shall be reviewed by the circuit court solely upon the pleadings and the transcript of the proceedings before the commissioner or the hearing examiner, and neither party shall be entitled to introduce any additional evidence in the circuit court.

Either party dissatisfied with the judgment or decree of the circuit court may, upon giving bond as required in other suits, appeal, and have a reexamination, in that court, of the whole matter of law and fact appearing in the record. When the appeal is made, the clerk of the circuit court in which the suit was pending shall include as a part of the record the original certified transcript of the proceedings had before the commissioner.

This section with regard to hearing and appeal shall also apply to actions of the commissioner pursuant to §§ 53-7-205, 53-7-212, 53-7-218 and 53-7-220, and shall be available to any party aggrieved by any act of the commissioner pursuant thereto.

Acts 1967, ch. 99, § 17; 1981, ch. 449, § 2; T.C.A., § 52-931; Acts 1989, ch. 147, § 4.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

The Tennessee Court System — Supreme Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 191.

53-7-218. Exclusive method of reviewing orders of commissioner — Disposition of confiscated property.

The remedy and procedure provided in § 53-7-217 shall be the exclusive method of reviewing all orders of the commissioner issued pursuant to the hearing authorized by this part and shall be the sole remedy of any petitioner or claimant. No judge or any court shall have the authority or jurisdiction to interfere by replevin, injunction, supersedeas or in any other manner, with any order of the commissioner issued pursuant to this part, but the order shall remain in full force and effect until the final decision of the supreme court, except where the judgment of the circuit court is not appealed from and has become a final judgment.

When the order of the commissioner or the judgment of any court becomes final, authorizing a seizure or confiscation, the device, material, article, commodity, product or any other thing being used, possessed or handled in contravention of this part shall be destroyed by the commissioner.

If no petition or claim is interposed, the property seized or confiscated shall be forfeited without further proceedings and the property shall be disposed of as provided for in subdivision (b)(1).

Acts 1967, ch. 99, § 18; T.C.A., § 52-932.

Cited: Hodges v. S. C. Toof & Co., 833 S.W.2d 896, 1992 Tenn. LEXIS 312 (Tenn. 1992).

53-7-219. Fees for licenses and inspections.

The fee for licenses and inspection issued pursuant to this part shall be set by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703.

Acts 1967, ch. 99, § 19; 1969, ch. 108, § 3; T.C.A., § 52-933; Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 36.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote the section which read: “(a) The fees for licenses and inspection issued pursuant to this part, which shall be in addition to all other fees or taxes of whatever kind, and shall be the sole fees required for meat and poultry inspection, shall be as follows:“(1)(A) For slaughtering establishments:“Slaughtering more than 4,000 animals annually: $ 100.00“Slaughtering 1,000 to 4,000 animals annually: 50.00“Slaughtering fewer than 1,000 animals annually: 25.00“Slaughtering any number of animals and poultry under United States department of agriculture inspection: 100.00“(B) In the determination of license and inspection fee brackets, the figures of the applicant for the last twelve (12) months prior to licensing shall be used if available; if not, the commissioner may, after consultation with the applicant, estimate the license fee bracket, subject to adjustment by rebate or additional charge as the facts may warrant at the end of the calendar year for which the license is issued and inspection fee charged.“(2) For meat processing establishments whose gross receipts from sales for the twelve (12) calendar months computed prior to issuance of license were:“In excess of $1,000,000: $ 100.00“$500,000-$1,000,000: 50.00“Less than $500,000: 25.00“Establishments processing meat or poultry whose gross receipts from sales for twelve (12) months computed prior to issuance of license were less than $10,000: 10.00“(3) For poultry eviscerating and processing plants whose gross receipts from sales for the twelve (12) calendar months computed prior to issuance of license were:“In excess of $1,000,000: $100.00“$1,000,000 or less: 50.00“Processing only, meat or poultry, under United States department of agriculture supervision: 100.00“(b) Payment of all license and inspection fees and meeting the other requirements of this part shall obviate the need for paying local government inspection fees for the same purposes.“(c) Fees collected shall constitute departmental receipts for use in the enforcement of this part.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 41. July 1, 2015; May 20, 2015, for the purpose of promulgating rules.

53-7-220. Licensing of custom slaughterers — Fee.

Upon application, custom slaughterers shall also be licensed by the department of agriculture for the same periods of time as other licensees; provided, that the custom slaughterers first satisfy the commissioner that they are qualified and competent to conduct their operations in conformity with the applicable provisions of this part and regulations duly promulgated pursuant to this part.

No person shall engage in custom slaughtering or deer processing without first being licensed.

The department shall collect from each custom slaughterer or deer processor an annual license fee set by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703.

Acts 1967, ch. 99, § 20; T.C.A., § 52-934; Acts 2007, ch. 421, § 19; 2015, ch. 485, § 37.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 421, § 20 provided that the commissioner of agriculture is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment to (c) substituted “set by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703” for “of twenty-five dollars ($25.00)”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 41. July 1, 2015; May 20, 2015, for the purpose of promulgating rules.